District of Columbia statutes.
46-357.13

Record in original language; English translation.

A record filed with a tribunal of the District under this subchapter must be in the original language and, if not in English, must be accompanied by an English translation.

History

Feb. 27, 2016, D.C. Law 21-73, § 713, 63 DCR 222